Colorado, session 2026A, HB1085.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-3-135 as
follows:
25-3-135. Do not abort form for pregnant person.
A PREGNANT PERSON'S HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER SHALL OFFER THE
PERSON THE OPTION TO FILL OUT A "DO NOT ABORT" FORM THAT
EXPRESSES THE PERSON'S WISHES TO NOT RECEIVE AN ABORTION IN THE
EVENT THE PERSON IS INCAPACITATED OR INCAPABLE OF COMMUNICATING.
IF THE PREGNANT PERSON FILLS OUT A "DO NOT ABORT" FORM, THE
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER SHALL INPUT THE FORM INTO THE PERSON'S
MEDICAL RECORD.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-2- HB26-1085